Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202542-1408
Family resource and juvenile assessment center; implement data collection system.

Each family resource and juvenile assessment center shall implement a data collection system to assess program effectiveness, track youth and family outcomes, and incorporate feedback directly from those served. The data collected shall be used to adjust and refine services, with a focus on measuring progress toward keeping youth out of the juvenile justice system and achieving positive life outcomes.

Laws 2025, LB48, § 8.